Utah statutes.
46-4-205.   Notarization and acknowledgment.
(1)  If a law requires a signature or record to be notarized, acknowledged,
verified, or made under oath, the requirement is satisfied by following the
procedures and requirements of Subsection 46-1-16(7).
(2)  The electronic signature of the person authorized to perform the acts
under Subsection (1), and all other information required to be included by
other applicable law, shall be attached to or logically associated with the
signature or record.
